West Virginia, session 2026, HB4633.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9A. PUBLIC SCHOOL SUPPORT. §18-9A-29. Enrollment stabilizer for budget planning. (a) Purpose. — The purpose of this section is to provide greater predictability and stability in county budgets and staffing by smoothing the impact of year-to-year enrollment changes used to calculate state aid under the Public School Support Program. (b) Enrollment stabilizer. — Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, for each county board, the net enrollment used in calculating state aid under the Public School Support Program for any school year shall be the greater of: (1) The actual net enrollment for the most recent school year as otherwise calculated by law; (2) A percentage, not to exceed 98 percent, of the prior year’s net enrollment; or (3) A three-year rolling average of net enrollment, calculated as the average of the current year and the two immediately preceding school years.